Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF5055.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; SOUTHEAST MINNESOTA TRANSPORTATION MANAGEMENT ORGANIZATION.new text end new text begin (a) $900,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of transportation for a grant to Southeast Service Cooperative for development and implementation of a transportation management organization that provides services in the counties of Dodge, Fillmore, Freeborn, Goodhue, Houston, Mower, Olmsted, Rice, Steele, Wabasha, and Winona. This appropriation is available for implementation costs, planning, and services related to transit and other forms of transportation. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2029. new text end new text begin (b) Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16B.98, subdivision 14, the commissioner must not use any amount of this appropriation for administrative costs. new text end